texmf/tex/generic/hiptex/cshyphts.tex
я1ньи
я1нью
я1нья
я1ню
я1ня
я1о2
я1па
я1пе
я1пи
я1по
я1пу
я1пы
я1пье
я1пьи
я1пью
я1пья
я1пю
я1пя
я1ра
я1ре
я1ри
я1ро
я1ру
я1ры
я1рье
я1рьи
я1рью
я1рья
я1рю
я1ря
я2с
я1са
я1се
я1си
яс1к
я1со
яс6т
я1ста
я1сте
я1сти
я1сто
я5стр
я1сту
я1сты
я1стье
я1стьи
я1стью
я1стья
я1стю
я1стя
я1су
я1сы
я1сье
я1сьи
я1сью
я1сья
я1сю
я1ся
я1та
ят1в
я1те
я5ти
я1то
я5тр
я1ту
я1ты
я1тье
я1тьи
я1тью
я1тья
я1тю
я1тя
я1у
я1фа
я1фе
я1фи
я1фо
я1фу
я1фье
я1фьи
я1фью
я1фья
я1фю
я1фя
я1ха
я1хе
я1хи
я1хо
я1ху
я1хы
я1хье
я1хьи
я1хью
я1хья
я1хю
я1хя
я1ца
я1це
я1ци
я1цо
я1цу
я1ча
я1че
я1чи
я1чу
я1чье
я1чьи
я1чью
я1чья
я1ша
я1ше
я1ши
я1шо
я1шу
я1шье
я1шьи
я1шью
я1шья
я1щ
я1ща
я1ще
я1щи
я1що
я1щу
я1щье
я1щьи
я1щью
я1щья
я1ы
я1э
я1ю
я1я
я'нь2
я'2тi
2я'щi
2я`
w1а
w1вj
w1к
w1н
w1п
w1р
w1с
w'2в
w=2
jь2ст
'2б1л
'1бы
'1бj
'1ве
'1во
'1вя
'1вj
'1в_
'1г
'2гл
'2гн
'1д
'1е2
'1ж
'з1в
'1зы
'1и2
'1к
'1ла
'1ли
'1ло
'1лю
'1н
'1ра
'1ре
'1ри
'1ро
'1ру
'1рj
'2сл
'со2
'2ст
'с1тj
'1т
'2тв
'2тл
'т1р
'2тw
'1ц
'1ш
'1щ
'1ю
'ю2с
'1я
'1_
'1i
=2б
=б1ла
=бjь1
=2в
=же2
=2з
=2к
=2л
=2ма
=м1н
=2н
=2п
=поя1
=2с
=с2л
=сп1р
=с1т
=т1
=1тв
=2ч
='2
='б1
=s1
^1ди
^д2на
^1и
^1ка
^1н
^1п
^1т
^1щ
^1я
`1с
i1а
i1е
i1и
iи2с
i1л
i1н
i1т
i1ю'щ
i1я
i'2л
i1_
i2_о
v'1
~2с2
~ст2
~т2
}}
\catcode '0136 = 13
\catcode '0137 = 13
\catcode '0176 = 13
